New York, session 2025-2026, S6740.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2009 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the county of Cattaraugus to impose an 3 additional mortgage recording tax, as amended by chapter 329 of the laws 4 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed December 1, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10517-01-5